Oklahoma, session 2025, SB653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2237, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2237. A. There is hereby created within the Oklahoma
Tourism and Recreation Department, the “Oklahoma Today Magazine”
Division. The Division shall be responsible for the publication of
the “Oklahoma Today Magazine” a minimum of six times per year.
B. “Oklahoma Today Magazine” is hereby authorized to sell
advertising. All advertising shall be approved by the appropriate
division director prior to acceptance for publication.
C. In addition to a regular salary, any employee of the
“Oklahoma Today Magazine” who obtains advertising, bulk
subscription, newsstand, or ancillary product sales, for “Oklahoma
Today Magazine”, at the discretion of the Executive Director of the
Department, may be awarded additional compensation in the form of a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB653 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

comm ission on net sales by the employee. The commission shall not
exceed twenty-five percent (25%), with the commission percentage to
be determined by the Executive Director. In no case shall the
additional compensation, when combined with the salary of the
employee, exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of the salary of the
Executive Director. Commission payments shall be paid monthly,
based on collected revenues from sales by the employee.
D. The sale of advertising and negotiation of rates for the
advertising shall not be subject to The the Oklahoma Central
Purchasing Act of 1974 or the Administrative Procedures Act.
E. “Oklahoma Today Magazine” articles, and photographs produced
by or for “Oklahoma Today Magazine”, shall be available for public
inspection during Department business hours. The Department shall
not be required to provide copies or allow copying of the magazine,
articles, or photographs other than as the Department provides
copies of “Oklahoma Today Magazine” for newsstand and subscription
sales.
F. The Department may deliver copies of “Oklahoma Today
Magazine” by electronic means through the Department’s subscription
sales.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB653 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)